tools/hyphenators/smn_hyph.tex
.ap1
.dá2
.fb1
.fd1
.fe1s
.ge2r1
.ht1
.hu2
.ic2
.if1
.ij1e
.il1
.io2
.jd1
.ne2
.nep1
.ng2
.nno1
.ob1
.oi1
.ok1
.pm1
.re1s
.sv2
.tv1
.vs1
.yt2
.øs2
a1aj
a1ak
aar1t
a1á2
a1â
a1ba
1abd
1abk
a1br
ab1ö
1acr
ac2su
a1č
ad2j1
a1dy
1aeg
a1em2
a1ep
ae1sk
a1f
a2fal
1afc
a2fo
1afs
a2fö
a1gu
ai1j
ai2l
a1í
a1já
1ajl
a1jo
aj1s2
a1jå
1akb
2akk
ak1oh
ak2ry
1aks
ak1w
ak1äv
a2kö
a1l
al2e
1alq
al2se
a2lu
a2lv
a2ly
am2f
a2m1ia
am2je
a1m2w
2ank
a1nr
a1o
a2os
a1ó
a1ò
a1p
ar1ee
ar2te
ar2ti
ar1uz
as2g
as2tr
1ašb
a1tr
at1v
a1þ
a1u2a
aua1s
a1uá
a1ux
a1ü
a1vy
a1w
ax1
a1y
1a2yl
a1z
a2zu
a1ž
a1æ
a1ø
a1ö
a1å
áa1
áá2m
á1b
ác2s
á1đ
á1f
áf2r
á1g
á2gu
á1h
á2hj
ái1h
ái1j
á1j
á2ju
1ákš
ál2u
á1ly
á1m
á2m1e
á2m1o
á2my
á1nj
á1q
á2re
á1ru
á1s
ás1t
ás2tv
á1u
áur2
áv2da
áv2do
á1vu
á1w
á1ž
á1æ
á1ä
á1ø
á1å
â1a
âá2
â1áj
â1b
â1c
â1dub
â1e
â1g
â2gu
âg1um
â1h
â2hl
â2hu
â1j2
âk2r
â1l
âl1um
â1nj
â1o
â1p
1âppe
âr2du
âr2h
â1tr
â1u
â1v
1bâ
b1âm
bâ2v
2b1b
bb2h
2bc
b2c1a
b1cl
2b1č
2b1ç
2b1d
bdj2
bd2n
b2du
b2dü
b1đ
1be
b1em
be2si
2b1f2
2b1g
2b1h
b2hu
1bi
2b1ip
2b1j
b2ja
b2ju
b2jö
2bk
bk1g
bk1u
2b1l
b2l1et
b2l1æ1
b2lö
2b1m2
2b1n
bn2s
bo1ođ
b1oov
2b1ov
b1ó
2bp
b2pa
b2p1o
b2p1ää
2b1q
b2r
2bs
bs2a
bs2d1
b2so
bs2s
2b1š2
2bt
bt1a
b2ti
b1t2k
b2to
bto1i
b1tr
bt1v
2bu
b1uá
b1ub
b1uo
b1uu
1bü
2b1v
b1w
b1x
b1yd
2b1z
2b1ž
1bä2
bø2
b1øl
b1ös
2b1å
1ca
ca2á
1cá
cá2m
1câ
c1b
2c1c
cc1ae
ccit2
c2c1r
c2cy
c1č
c1ç
2c1d
cds2
1ce
ce1m
2c1er
c1esá
ce2v
2c1é
c1f
c1gw
2c1h
c2hal
c2hl
ch2ne
c2hu
1c2i
ci2n
ci2p
ci2t
1cî
c1j2
2c1k
ck2l
c1l
cl1ov
c2ly
2cm
c1mu
c1mæ
2c1n2
1co
coc2
c1ò
1cô
2c1p2
c1q
c2re
c2ro
2c1s
c2sa
cs2k
c2s1o
cs1y
c1š2
2c1t
c1þ
1cu
c1ub
c1ur
c2uv
2cuvs
2c1ü
1cú
2c1v
c1x
c1y
c2yn
2cz
c2æ
c1ä
c1øh
c1ö
1ča
čá2đ
1čâ
čb2
2č1č
1či
2č1j2
2č1k
1čo
1č2s2
čsv1
1č2u
1čy
čå2
1da
da2re
1dá
d1át
1dâ
dâ1šk
2d1b
2d1c
2d1č
d1ç
2d1d
dd2u
1de
d1ex
2df
dfa1x
df1j
d1fn
d1fu
2d1g2
2d1h2
1di
d1ic
2d1ihl
di1o
d2is
di1šk
2d1í
2dj
2d1k
dk1e
dk2k
2d1l
dl2l
dl2n
dls2
dl2u
2d1m
dm2å
2d1n2
1do
d1oh
d2ok
do2l1
1dó
d1ò
2d1p2
2d1q
2d1r
d2ra
dr1ov
2d1s
d2sa
ds2ki
ds2q
d2sø
2d1š2
2d1t
dt2k
dt2s
d1u
2duá
1duč
1duđ
1duh
1dui
d2ur
2duv
1duž
d1ü
2d1v2
2d1w
d1x
d1ye
2d1z
d2zu
d2æd
2d1ä
d2ør
2d1ö
d1å
d2åg
1d2'
1đa
1đá2
1đâ
đâ1du
2đ1b
đd2
2đ1đ2
1đe
đe1ih
đf2
2đ1g2
2đ1h
1đi
đk2
đ1m2
2đ1n
đ1ŋ
1đo
đp2
2đ1s
đ1u
đ2um
2đ1v2
e1a
e2ar
e1b
e2br
1ech
e1cr
e1č
e1ç
e1d
ed2mi
e2du
e1ep
ee2s
ef2lo
e1g
eg2ü
ei1e
ei1j
ei1nj
e1j
e2ju
1ekr
el1š
el2t
e2lu
1elv
el1y
e1lö
2enč
e1nj
1eno
e2nol
eŋ2ge
e1o
e2oi
e1ó
1epi
2e2p1ä
e1q
e2rel
er1tr
er1um
e2ry
e1ræ
e2sa
es1eb
esi1i
e2s1o
e1sø
e1þ
e1u
2euc
1eun
e2ur
eur1a
eu1x
evn2
1evš
e1vu
ew1u
e1xa
e1xb
e1xt
e1y
e1ø
e1ö
e1å
é1a
é1b
é1d
é1l
1é1m
é1n
é2nå
é1o
é1r2
é1t
é1u
1é1v
éx1
ê1z
1fa
fa2sä
1fá
f1áj
f1áp
1fâ
2f1b
2f1c
fc1u
fc1z
2f1č
2fd
f2d1a
fdi2
fd1j
1fe
2f1f
f2fo
f2fu
2f1g2
2f1h
1fi
fi1im
1f2j
f1ja
f1já
2fji
2fk
f2k1o
f2k1u
fk2v
f1ky
f1l2
fl1oo
2f1m
fm1i
fm2u
f1n
fnr1
f2nu
1fo
f1ob
f1oe
f1ol
fo1sk
fou1
fo1x
f1ó
f1ò
2f1p
fp1j
f1q
f1r
fra1
2fre
fr1k2
2fs2
fs1d
fs1em
fs1i
fst1o
f2s1u
2f1š2
2f1t2
f1þ
f1u
2fuđ
fu2g
1fuk
1ful
1fü
2f1v
f1w2
f1x
1fy
f2yg
2f1z
f1äl
1fø
2føy
1fö
f1ös
f1ål
1ga
gaf2
ga2p
1gá
gá2đ
g1áŋ
1gâ
gâ2v
2gb
g1ba
gb1i
gb1u
gb1y
gb1ä
g1c
2g1č
g1ç
2gd
gd1i
g1d2n
g2d1o
g1då
1ge
geg2
ge2nu
g1ep
g1f2
2g1g
2gh2
g2he
g2hi
1gi
gii1s
gi2ri
gi1ru
g1í
2g1j
gj1er
g2ju
2g1k
2g1l
gl2j
gl2r
g2lä
1gł
2g1m
gm2u
g2mü
2g1n
g2nag
2g1ŋ
1go
g1ol
go1nj
2gp
g1ps
gpu1
gp1y
2g1q
2g1r2
g2rä
g2rö
2g1s2
g2sa
gs1l
2g1š2
2g1t
gt2m
g2tu
g1uá
gu1sk
2guv
2g1v2
g1we
g2wi
g1wl
g1x
2gz2
g1æn
g1äh
g1äp
g1ø
g2ør
g2øs
g1öl
g1ös
g1å
g2år
1ha
h1aq
1há
1hâ
hâ2s
2h1b
2h1c
hc2k
h1č
hd1
h1dø
2h1đ
1he
2heo
h2ep
2h1f
2h1g2
2h1h2
1hi
hi1eg
h2ii
hi1iv
h2in
h1io
h1j
2h1k
h2lu
2h1m2
2h1n
h2no
h2nu
1ho
2hoi
ho1sl
2h1ó
2hô
2h1p
hp2h
2h1r
hr2g1
h2ro
hr1ov
h2ru
h2rw
hr2z
2h1s
h2si
hs1l
hs1t
2h1š
2h1t
ht2k
h2tu
h1þ
h1u
h2ua
h2uá
1huh
h2um
1huu
2huv
1hü
2hv
h2ve
hv2s1
h1vu
h1ym
h1yr
h2yu
1hä
h1äm
1hö
h1öl
i1a
i2aná
ia1š
1i2at
i1á
i1â
i1b
i2br
i2cu
1iččá
id1ob
i1đ
i2đu
ie2a
i1ee
i1ep
i1é
i1f
i2fá
1ifi
i2fl
1i2fn
i2fu
i2fü
i1g
ii2â
i1imo
1iiš
i1ja
i1já
2ijng
i1jo
i1jä
i1jö
i1k
i2kh
ik2š
i2ku
i2kå
i1l
i2l1um
1imd
i1mä
in1jo
in2ne
1inst
i1nä
i1ŋ
i1os
ios1i
i1ox
i1ò
i1p
1ipa
1iph
i2pi
ip1in
ip1j
i2pu
i2py
i2p1ä
i2pö
i2r1an
ir1äm
is1ee
is1ih
i1s2q
iss2
i2su
itø1
i1u2
1iue
i1ü
i1v
i2vd
1ivem
iv1oo
i2vr
iv1t
i2vu
i1w
i1xb
i1y
i1ze
izh1
i1ž
i1æ
i1ø
i1ö
í1n
1í1s
í1z
2jaa
ja1ac
2jad
2jai
ja2ko
ja2kä
ja1q
ja1x
1jááv
1jáh
2jár
1jâ
jâ2lu
jâ2s
j1b1
j1c
2j1č
2jd
j1dj
jdl2
jds2
j1đ
1je
2je2r1
jeu2
jf2
j1g
2j1h
jh1e
jh1l
jht2
1ji
ji2e
2j1j
2j1k
jk1a
j2k2h
jk1i
2j1l
jl1e
jm2b
jo2d1
1joi
jo1og
jo1op
1jó
j1p
2j1r1
2js
j2s1a
js1t
j1š
2jt
j1tvu
j1u
1juh
1jus
j1v
jv1y
j1w
j2æ
j1än
2jø
jø2s
jøs1a
jø1st
1ka
ka1ic
k1ax
1ká
ká1áá
ká2đ
ká2l
1kâ
2k1b2
kbb1
2k1c2
2k1č
k1ç
k1d
kd1e
1ke
1ké
2k1f
k1gj
k1gs
k1gu
k1h
2kho
1khr
k2hu
1ki
ki2e
k1if
2kio
ki2si
2k1j
kjs2
2k1k
kk2u
2k1l
kl2j
k2lü
2km
km1i
km2lo
k1mn
k2m1o
k1mt
2k1n
1k2o
2koe
2k1ow
k1ò
2k1p
k2pö
k1r
kr2f
k2rø
2ks
k1s2k
ks2n
ks1ø
2k1š
kš2n
kš2u
2k1t
kt1av
k2té
k2tr
k2tu
k2tv
1ku
k1ub
k1uf
2kui
2kuv
2k1v
k2ve
kw2
k1wr
k1x
2ky
k1z
k1æ
1kä
1kø
1kö
1kå
1la
la1e
2l1al
la1mj
la1u1
1lá
1lâ
lâ2s
2l1b2
l2b1r
l2by
2lc2
l2c1â
l1cl
l1cy
l1cz
2l1č
l1ç
2l1d
ld2h
ld1ov
ld2u
1le
le1ei
lef1
l1el
le1tr
le1tv
l2é
2lf
lf1d
lf1el
2l1g
lg2u
2l1h
1li
li1or
l1ip
2l1j2
2l1k
lka2
lk2h
2l1l
llej2
l2lep
l2l1id
2l1m
lm2i
lm1oo
l2mu
lm2ø
2l1n
l2nâ
1lo
lo2k
2l1ol
l2on
lovn2
2loy
l2ó
2l1ò
2lô
2lp
l1p2t
lp1u
2l1q
2l1r
lr1e
2l1s
ls1ei
ls2m
ls1o
ls2og
ls2t
ls1ä
2lš
l1šk
l1šr
2l1t
l2ta
2l1þ
1lu
2l1ur
l1uum
2luv
l1ü
2lú
l1v
1l2vo
2l1w
2l1x
lx1e
1lyp
l1z2
1læ
lær2ø
l2æs
1lä
l1äk
l1äp
l1är
1lø
l1öb
l1ål
l2ås
1l'
1ma
m1ao
1má
m1áv
1mâ
mâ2l
m1âma
mâ1r
2m1b
mb1p
mb1r
2m1c
mc2c
2m1č
m1ç
2m1d
md2b
md2l
md1o
1me
2m1ep
me2ro
me2su
2m1f2
2m1g
mg1u
2m1h2
1mi
mi2lu
m2in
m1ip
m1í
2m1j
m2jå
2mk
m1k2r
mk1w
2ml
ml1c
ml2mâ
ml1o
2m1m
mm2b
mme1t
2m1n2
m2na
m2nu
1mo
m1ob
mo1e
m1oh
m2oi
m1om
m1ó
m1ò
2m1p
mpe1
mp2h
2m1q
2m1r2
2m1s
ms2h
m2s1o
ms2to
2m1š
m2šk
mš2u
m1tr
m2tro
2mtt
m2tø
m1u
m2uá
1mud
1mui2
1m2um
1muo
1mus
1muš
1muu
2muv
1muž
2m1v2
m1w
2m1x
m2xb
m1y
m2ya
m2yr
m1z
m1äm
m1äv
2mög
m2öi
1må
1na
na1b
na1t
2nay
1ná
ná2h
1nâ
2n1b
2n1c
n1č
n1ç
2n1d
nd1ei
nde1s
1ne
n2enu
2nep
ne2se
n1é
2n1g
n2gu
2n1h2
1ni
n2ie
n1í
1nî
nj2
1nja
n2jas
n2jâ
n2joo
2njó
n1jø
2n1k
n2kh
nk1iž
n2kr
nk1u
nk1y
2n1l2
nls1
2n1m2
nmt1
2n1n
nn1er
nn2j
n2nr
1no
n2om
1nó
n1ò
2n1p
np1i
n1q
n2r
nr1a
nr2ka
nr1o
n1ru
nr1x
nr1y
nr1ä
nr1ø
nr1å
2n1s
ns1g
ns2l
nsr1
ns2tâ
n2sø
2n1š
2nt
n1tb
n2t1ed
nt2ha
nt2n
n2t1o
n1tra
n1t2u
n1u
1n2ua
1nub
2nud
1n2um
1nuo
1nup
1nus
1nuš
1nut
1nuu
2nuv
1nuvn
n1ü
n1v
2n1w
n1x
n2x1i
1ny
n2y1a
2nyo
n1z
n2zh
n1ž
n2æ
nær1
n1äm
2n1ø
nøk1
n2øt
n1öl
1nå
n1åb
n1ån
1ŋá
ŋál2
1ŋâ
ŋd2
1ŋe2
2ŋ1g
ŋi2
ŋ1j
ŋk2h
ŋ1l
ŋn2
ŋ1ŋ
1ŋo
ŋ1r
ŋs2
ŋš2
ŋ2u
ŋv2
o1a
o2af
1o2ax
o1b
oc2t
o1ç
o1đ
1off
of1s
og2e
og1o
1ogp
o1gu
o1gy
2ohâ
ohk2
oi2a
oi1j
o1ir
1oiv
o1j2
ok2se
ok1st
2olf
1olg
1olj
o2l1oh
o2l1um
o1m
om1el
om1l
o2mt
o2mu
2onh
on1j
on2tr
o1næ
o1ode
o2oi
oo2k
oo2m
o1oo
o1ò
o1q
o1ré
ork1a
2osi
os2l1o
os2o
os2sa
os2t
os1tw
os1y
o1tr
2ou
o1ua
o1uš
1o1ü
ov2bü
1ovd
o1w
1owr
o2wu
ox1
o1y
oy1ah
o2yar
o2yi
oy1ö
o1z
o1ä
o1ø
o1ö
o1å
1ó1d
ól2
ó1p
ó1s
ò1d
2òi
ôb2
ôg2
ôh2
ô1m2
ô1n
ôp2
ôs2
ô1t
1pa
pa2b
pa2de
1pá
pá2đ
1pâ
2p1b
pb1u
p2b1y
p2bæ
2p1c
2p1č
2p1ç
2pd2
pdf1
1pe
pe2c1
p1et
2p1f2
p2fn
pfu1
2pg
pg1u
2p1h
ph1ø
1pi
pi1o
p1ip
p1iq
p1iž
p1í
2pj
2p1k
p2k1u
2p1l
p2lø
2p1m
pm2u
2p1n
1po
p1ò
2p1p
p2pæ
2p1q
2p1r2
p2ro
p2ry
2p1s
p2sa
p2sel
ps2h
ps2k
ps2t
p2sæ
2p1š2
2p1t2
2p1ub
1pum
2puv
2p1ü
2p1v
2p1w
2p1x2
p1z
p2æ
1pä
p1äv
1pø
p1øi
p1ør
p1ö
p2ös
1pål
p1år
q1b
q1ep
q1g
q1h
1qi
q1k2
q2l
ql2l
qm2
1qo
q1p2
q1q
qr2
qs2
q1t2
1q2v
q1w2
q1z
q1æ
2q1ø
1ra
ra1e
r1al
ra2na
ra1r
1rá
rá2đ
1râ
râ2šk
2r1b2
rbk1
2r1c
r2cu
2r1č
r1ç
2r1d
r2dip
rd1j
rd2ü
r2dy
r2dæ
1re
r1ep
2rf
r2f1e
r2fj
r2fy
2r1g
rgd2
rg2r
2r1h
r2he
r2ho
1ri
ri1ip
r1iq
ri1tr
2r1j
r2jä
rk1as
r2kø
2r1l
rl2u
r1m
rm2u
2r1n
rna1i
rn2n
rn2ø
r2nå
r1ŋ
1ro
ro1el
ro2me
r2ot
r1ò
2rô
2r1p
rp2ho
r2p1u
r1q
2r1r2
rrs2
2r1s
rs2a
rs2da
rsi1j2
rs1in
rs2t
r1š
2rt
rt1ed
rt2hu
r1þ
1r2uá
1rub.
1ruc
1rud
1rup
1ruu
rün1
2r1v
rx1
r1xa
1ry
r1ye
r2yu
r1z
r2zb
1rä
r1øs
r1ö
r2ör1
2rå
r2åd
1sa
s1ac
s1ar
sar1t
sa1t
1sá
sá2h
1sâ
sâ2š
2s1b
2s1c
s2ca
sc1in
s2cæ
2s1č
2s1ç
2sd
s2d1e
s2d1i
s1d2l
sd1oo
sd2r
1se
2s1ef
s1eŋ
2s1é
2sf
s2fa
s2fi
s1fn
sf2o
sf2r
s1fä
s1få
2sg
sg1d
s2go
s1gs
sg1u
2s1h2
1si
2siat
2sif
si1it
s1ijj
s1ip
si2se
2s1j
s2je
sj1eu
sj2u
2s1k
s2kh
s2kid
s2kö
2sl
sle1s
sl2f
sl1y
s2lä
2s1m
smt2
2s1n
1so
s1oc
s1of
s1oh
s2ok
2s1o2l
2s1ó
2s1ò
2s1p2
s2pi
s1q
2s1r
sra2
s2re
sr1el
1s2ri
sr2j
s2r1x
s2rz
2s1s
sss2
ss1t
s2sua
s2suo
2s1š2
2st
s2tab
st1ef
st1v
2s1þ
1su
s2uá
2suv
s1ux
2s1ü
2sv
svn2
sv1o
s1vu
s1væ
2s1w
2s1x
2sy
s1yn
s1yr
2s1z
s1æn
1sä
s1øb
s1ør
s1ö
s2öl
sös1
2s1å2
s2åh
1ša
1šá
šá2h
1šâ
šâ2s
š1b2
š1c
š1č
2š1d
1še
šg2
2š1h
1ši
ši1o
2š1j2
š1k
2šká
2škâ
2ške
2š2kh
2ški
š2ku
1šky
2šl
2š1m2
š1n2
š2ny
1šo
2š1p
š2r
2š1s2
2š1š2
2š1t
št2h
št2m
št2u
2š1u
1šub
1šud
š2ur
1šuub
1šuuv
1šuž
2š1v
šv2r
šw2
1ta
2tad
2tav
1tá
t1ák
1tâ
t1b2
t2bi
t1c2
tco1
2t1č
2t1ç
2t1d2
td1e
2t1đ
1te
t2en
2t1ep
t1ez
2t1f
tf1ø
2t1g
2t1h
t2h1o
1ti
t2if
t1ivn
2t1í
2t1j
1t2jæ
2t1k
t2kac
tk2h
2t1l
tl2f
tl2l
tl2u
t2l1ä
t2lå
2t1m2
tme1e
tme1s
2t1n
t2nf
tn1tr
1to
t1oa
tod2
to1e
2tok
2t1ooi
to1s
1tó
2t1p
2t1q
t2r
2tre
1tro
t1ru
t1rw
tr1ån
2t1s2
t2sow
2t1š2
t2še
2t1t
tt1ok
tt2p
t2tr
t2tuu
t2tö
t2tå
t1þ
t1u
2tuá
1tuh
1tui
1tul
tu2lu
2tum
1tumu
1tuo
1tup
t2ur
1tus
1tuš
1tuuh
2tuv
1tuvh
1tuvu
1tuž
1tüc
t2v
tvn2
tv1o
tv1ä
t1w
2t1x
t1y
t2ye
t2yl
2t1z
t2z1b
t2zy
t1äv
t1ää
1tø
t1øh
2t1øi
t2øt
t1øv
1tö
t1åk
ŧd2
ŧg2
ŧk2
ŧl2
ŧm2
ŧn2
ŧp2
ŧs2
ŧš2
ŧu2
ŧz2
u1a
u2al
1u2ar
2uas
u1áá
1uái
1uál
uá2nj
2u1b
1ubb
1ubm
u2b1r
2uc
uc1r
2uč
u1ç
2ud
ud2l
2uđ
1uđ2đ
2ue
u2el
u1em
u1ep
ue1s
u1et
u1é
u2f1a
u2fo
u2fö
2u1g
u2gå
2uh
2ui
ui2bo
ui1e
ui1h
ui1j
ui2s
u1iž
u1í
2u1j
u2ju
2uk
1ukh
uk1s
u2ku
2ul
u1ló
2umb
u1mé
2umg
2umh
um2k1
2umn
2ums
2umu
2umv
2un
u2nov
2uŋ
2uo
uo1in
uo2ma
2u1ó
2up
u2p1a
u1r
2uri
u2rk
u2rm
2urt
u2ru
u2rw
1urø
2us
us2b
us2do
us1tr
u2su
2u1š
1ušm
u2šn
2u1t
u2tc
u2t1v
2u1þ
2uu
uu2k
u1uo
u1ü
1uv
uv1a
2uvá
2uvâ
2uvb
2uvč
2uvg
2uvh
2uvi
2uvl
2uvn
uv1ov
2uvr
2uvt
2uvu
u1v2uá
2uvv
2uw
u1xa
u1xi
u1y
u2ya
2u1ž
u1æ
2u1ä
2u1ø
2u1ö
u1å
ü1b
ü1d
2üf
ü1g
2ü1l
ü1p
2ür
1üs
2üss
2ü1t
ütv1
ü1u
ú1c
û1n
1va
v1ac
v1aj
v1ao
v1aq
1vá
vá2m
1vâ
vâ1šk
2v1b
vb2l1
2v1c
v2cu
v1č
v1ç
vd1as
v2d1e
vd1o
vds2
v1d2u
v1d2v
v1då
v1đ
1ve
vede1
v1ex
v1é
v1f
v2fá
2v1g
vg2h
1vgn
v2gu
2v1h2
vhs1
1vi
v1ip
v2is
v1í
v1j
v2ja
2vk
v1km
v1kw
2v1l
vl2j
vl2l
2v1m
2v1n
v2n1j
vn2je
vnt2
v1ŋ
1vo
v2oh
vo1hl
v2om
vo2s
2vov
v1ow
v1ó
v1ò
v1p1
vp2f
v1r
2v1s
v2s1a
v2s1e
vs2j
vs1ur
v1š2
2vt
v1tr
v1tå
v1ub
v1uc
v1ul
vun2
1vuo
v1ur
2vuv
v1ü
2v1v2
vvs1
2v1w
v1x
v1yg
v1z2
v1ž
1vä
2v1ø
v1ö
1vå
v1åk
w1ak
w1aq
1wá
1wâ
2w1b
w1d
wd2n
w1é
w1gr
w2h
who1
w1hr
1wi
w1ip
w1j
w1k
w2l
2w1n
2wol
w1p
2w1r2
w1s
w1š
2w1t2
wto1
w1ur
w1ut
1wü
w1v
w2w
ww1e
w1wh
w1x
w2y1
w1yi
w1z
w1äh
w1äi
w1än
wø1
w1øk
x1am
x2av
x1á
x1â
x1b
x1c
x2c1e
x1d
x2ed
x2en
x2er
x1é
x1f
x1g
x1h
x2in
x1i1t
x1j
x1l
x1m2
xml1
x1n
x1o
x1p
xp2h
x1q
x1r
x1s2
xsl1
x1š
x2tr
xt2w
x1þ
x2uz
x1ü
x1v
x1w
2x1x1
xx2i
x1y
2x1z
x1ä
x1ø
x1ö
x1å
1ya
y1al
yam2
2yá
y1ág
2yâ
y1b
y2c
yc1i
yc1r
y1ç
yd2m
yd2ru
ye2a
2yeđ
ye2h1
y1enm
y1g
yg2v
y1h
y2i
2yij
yi2n
y1j
2yk
1yll
y2lu
y1m2u
1yo
y1oc
yo2g
y1pl
y1r
y2s1a
ys2j
ys2s1
y2su
y1š
1ytr
y1ty
y1þ
1yu
y1ub
y1v
y1w
yx2
2yy
y1z
y1ä
y2öd
y1å
ý2r
ý1v
1za
1zá
zá2đ
zá2s
1zâ
1zb
2zc2
zd2
zf2
2z1g2
z2ha
z2hi
1zi
zi2l
z2j2
z1k2
zl2
zm2
2z1n
z1ov
z1p2
z1r2
z1s2
zš2
2z1t2
1zü
2z1v
z2w
z1ye
2z1z
1žá
1žâ
žd2
1že
žh2
žl2
žp2
žs2
žt2
žw2
2ž1ž
æ1c2
1æd
æd2s
æi1t
æj2
æ1l2
1æ1m2
æ1n
æ2nu
æp2f
æp2t
æ2ro
ær2z
1æs
æs2a
æ1s2t
æ1s2ø
ä1ba
äb2h
ä1ç
2äd
ä1đu
ä1ep
äe1s
ä1g
ägu1
ä1hu
ä1j
älâ1d
ä1m
än1
änf2
äp2h
ä1ru
ä2su
ä1t
ät2tv
ät2y
ä1u
1ävŋ
äv2ru
ä1vu
1äy
ä1z
ø1b
øc2
ød2m
1ø2f1
ø2g
ø1ie
øi1s2
øi1t
ø2k
2ølu
1øn
ø1p2
ø1q
ø1ru
ør2æ
øs2ki
ø1š
1øt
øt2u
øt2ø
ø1u
1øw
1ø2y
ø1z
ö1b
1öc
1ö1d
1öi
2ök
öl2u
2öm2
ön2g
2öp
öp2h
öp2t
ör2n
ö2ro
ör2z
ö1r2ö
ös2a
ös2j
ö2so
öš2
2ö1t
öu2
ö1v
1öy
1ö1z
å1am
å1b2
1åd
å1f
1åh
åk2s
å1l
ål2j
åm2
ån2n1
å1o
åor2
åpän2
å1q
2ård
1ås
åst1
ås1ø
å1š
åt1i
åt1o
ått2
2å1v
å1z
å1å
'a1q
'2b
'2h
's2
